lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_strongGH.txt
!========================================
LEXICON NounInflV
!  for noun roots that end in strong -gh:
!    -aagh, -iigh, -uugh
!========================================

!-------------------------------------|
!            ABSOLUTIVE               |
!-------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^0                 PostInflV; ^[Abs.Pl]:^et                  PostInflV; ^[Abs.Du]:^ek             PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ka PostInflV; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^enka        PostInflV; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^egka   PostInflV;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^put       PostInflV; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}put  PostInflV; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^egput  PostInflV;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^pung      PostInflV; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}pung PostInflV; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^egpung PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^en        PostInflV; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten         PostInflV; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^egken  PostInflV;
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^si        PostInflV; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}si   PostInflV; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^egsi   PostInflV;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^tek       PostInflV; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek  PostInflV; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^egtek  PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^a         PostInflV; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^i           PostInflV; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^kek    PostInflV;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^at        PostInflV; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^it          PostInflV; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^egket  PostInflV;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^ak        PostInflV; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^ik          PostInflV; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^egkek  PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ni PostInflV; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}ni   PostInflV; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^egni   PostInflV;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^teng      PostInflV; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}teng PostInflV; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^egteng PostInflV;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^tek       PostInflV; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek  PostInflV; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^egtek  PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------|
!      RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)     |
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^em                    PostInflV; ^[Rel.Pl]:^et                    PostInflV; ^[Rel.Du]:^ek               PostInflV;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^ma            PostInflV; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^ma            PostInflV; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^egma     PostInflV;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflV; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflV; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemta   PostInflV;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflV; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflV; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtung PostInflV;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflV; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflV; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpek    PostInflV;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflV; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflV; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesi   PostInflV;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflV; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflV; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetek  PostInflV;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^an            PostInflV; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^an            PostInflV; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkenka  PostInflV;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^ita           PostInflV; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^ita           PostInflV; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^egkenka  PostInflV;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^ita           PostInflV; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^ita           PostInflV; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^egkenka  PostInflV;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mi            PostInflV; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mi            PostInflV; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmi     PostInflV;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meng          PostInflV; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meng          PostInflV; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeng   PostInflV;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^meng          PostInflV; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^meng          PostInflV; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmeng   PostInflV;
!-----------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------------|
!                ABLATIVE MODALIS                 |
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^meng                      PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^neng                      PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^egneng              PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemneng    PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnneng   PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegneng PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpeneng    PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegneng   PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesineng  PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegneng PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^aneng             PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^aneng             PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkeneng    PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itneng            PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itneng            PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^itneng      PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkeneng          PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itneng            PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^itneng      PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mineng            PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mineng            PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmineng    PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggneng          PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggneng          PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggneng  PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megneng           PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megneng           PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegneng   PostInflV;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megteneng         PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megteneng         PostInflV; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegteneng PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
!           LOCATIVE (localis)              |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^mi                      PostInflV; ^[Loc.Pl]:^ni                      PostInflV; ^[Loc.Du]:^egni              PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflV; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflV; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemni    PostInflV;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflV; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflV; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnni   PostInflV;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflV; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflV; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegni PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpeni    PostInflV;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflV; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegni   PostInflV;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflV; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflV; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesini  PostInflV;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflV; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflV; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegni PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^ani             PostInflV; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^ani             PostInflV; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkeni    PostInflV;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itni            PostInflV; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itni            PostInflV; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^itni      PostInflV;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkeni          PostInflV; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itni            PostInflV; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^itni      PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mini            PostInflV; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mini            PostInflV; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmini    PostInflV;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggni          PostInflV; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggni          PostInflV; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggni  PostInflV;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megni           PostInflV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megni           PostInflV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegni   PostInflV;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megteni         PostInflV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megteni         PostInflV; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegteni PostInflV;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
!          ALLATIVE (terminalis)             |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^mun                      PostInflV; ^[All.Pl]:^nun                      PostInflV; ^[All.Du]:^egnun              PostInflV;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflV; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflV; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemnun    PostInflV;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflV; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflV; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnnun   PostInflV;
